Tennessee, session 114, SB0826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-708(3)(C), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(xvii) Services furnished by persons engaged in the appraisal of real estate or
real property.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-708(3)(C), is amended by
deleting the language "subdivisions (3)(C)(i)-(xvi)" wherever it appears and substituting instead
the language "subdivisions (3)(C)(i)-(xvii)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0826
002871
- 1 -